Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
PART 9
SOLID WASTE-TO-ENERGY INCINERATION SYSTEMS

Cross references:

For the calculation by the public utilities commission of avoided cost information prior to construction of a solid waste-to-energy incineration system, see § 40-3-112; for authorization for municipalities to develop solid waste-to-energy systems, see part 10 of article 15 of title 31.

Law reviews:

For article, "The Legal Structure and Financing of Waste-to-Energy Projects - Part 1", see 14

C

olo. Law. 574 (1985).

30-20-901. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that methods for the efficient and economical production of usable energy should be achieved whenever possible and that the use of flammable waste material for the conversion of heat into steam, electrical power, or any other form of energy could provide energy in an efficient and economical manner. For such purposes, the provisions of this part 9 are enacted to authorize counties to develop this type of energy for their own use and the use of the public.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire part added, p. 1241, § 2, effective May 31.

30-20-902. Definitions.

As used in this part 9, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Solid waste-to-energy incineration system" means the use of flammable waste material as a primary or supplemental fuel for the conversion of heat into steam, electrical power, or any other form of energy.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire part added, p. 1242, § 2, effective May 31.

30-20-903. County authority relating to solid waste-to-energy incineration systems.

The board of county commissioners of any county has the power to:

Acquire, hold, use, transfer, and convey any real or personal property for the purpose of developing and operating a solid waste-to-energy incineration system;

Engage in any activities relating to the siting, development, and operation of a solid waste-to-energy incineration system and to the production and sale of energy from such system;

Issue revenue bonds authorized by action of the board of county commissioners, without the approval of the qualified electors of the county, for purposes of financing the siting and development of a solid waste-to-energy incineration system and the production and marketing of energy from such system. Such revenue bonds shall be issued in the manner provided in part 4 of article 35 of title 31, C.R.S., for the issuance of revenue bonds by municipalities; except that such revenue bonds may be sold in one or more series at par, or below or above par, at public or private sale, in such manner and for such price as the county, in its discretion, shall determine. Such revenue bonds and interest coupons, if any, appurtenant thereto shall never constitute the debt or indebtedness of the county within the meaning of any provision or limitation of the state constitution or statutes, and shall not constitute nor give rise to a pecuniary liability of the county or a charge against its general credit or taxing powers. Such revenue bonds and the income therefrom are exempt from taxation, except inheritance, estate, and transfer taxes.

Enter into contracts, including intergovernmental contracts pursuant to section 29-1-203, relating to the acts authorized by this part 9;

Establish such terms and conditions by contract, resolution, or any other method for the siting, development, and operation of a solid waste-to-energy incineration system and the production and sale of energy from such system;

Set, maintain, and revise charges for the disposal of solid waste at a solid waste-to-energy incineration system facility and for the sale of energy from such system for the purpose of financing the property, facilities, and operation of the system;

Exercise any other powers which are essential in performing the acts authorized by this part 9;

Perform any nonlegislative acts authorized by this part 9 by means of an agent or by contract with any person, firm, or corporation.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire part added, p. 1242, § 2, effective May 31.

30-20-904. Department of public health and environment rules.

The department of public health and environment may promulgate rules for the engineering design and operation of solid waste-to-energy incineration systems, and any such system shall comply with such rules before beginning operations.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire part added, p. 1243, § 2, effective May 31.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 2800, § 560, effective July 1.